Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 7
REGIONAL SERVICE AUTHORITIES

Law reviews:

For article, "The Regional Approach for Art,

C

ulture and Library Services", see 16

C

olo. Law. 1975 (1987).

Section

32-7-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Service Authority Act of 1972".

Source:

L. 72:

p. 452, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-1.

32-7-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the purpose of this article is to implement the provisions of section 17 of article XIV of the state constitution, adopted at the 1970 general election, by providing for and facilitating the formation and operation of a limited number of service authorities in the state of Colorado. It is further declared that the orderly formation and operation of regional service authorities providing authorized functions, services, and facilities and exercising powers granted by this article will serve a public use and will promote the health, safety, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants thereof and the people of the state of Colorado. It is further declared to be the policy of the state of Colorado to encourage the utilization of single service authorities to provide those functions, services, and facilities which transcend local government boundaries, thus reducing the duplication, proliferation, and fragmentation of local governments, and encouraging establishment of efficient, effective, and responsive regional government. To these ends, this article shall be liberally construed.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 452, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-2.

Cross references:

For service authorities, see § 17 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.

32-7-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of a service authority.

"Concurrent", when used in regard to the provision of a service by a service authority, means that a service may be provided by a service authority in accordance with the provisions of this article, but the administration of such service shall not preclude counties, municipalities, or special districts from providing the same or similar service. This definition does not prohibit counties, municipalities, or special districts from contracting with each other or with a service authority for the provision of a local service, nor does it prohibit counties, municipalities, or special districts from relinquishing control of a local service by agreement with a service authority or by vesting exclusive jurisdiction for the provision of a given service with the service authority.

"County" means a home rule or statutory county and includes a city and county.

(3.5) "Eligible elector" of a service authority means an individual who resides within the service authority and is registered and otherwise qualified to vote in county elections in a county which is located within the service authority.

"Exclusive", when used in regard to the provision of a service by a service authority, means that the service authority shall have sole governmental responsibility and authority for the provision of such service within its boundaries, but this definition shall not prohibit a service authority from contracting with counties, municipalities, special districts, or nongovernmental persons or entities for the provision of any aspect of such service to the residents therein.

"General election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November in every even-numbered year, as provided in section 1-4-201, C.R.S., for the purpose of electing members of the board and for submission of other public questions, if any.

"Local government" means a county, city and county, municipality, or special district organized pursuant to this title or pursuant to article 8 of title 29 or part 2 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S.

"Local improvement district" means an area within a service authority in which the real property is specially benefited and constitutes the basis of assessment for all or part of the cost of the construction or installation of designated improvements within such area.

"Municipality" means a home rule or statutory city or town or a city and county.

"Population" means the population as estimated by the court, commission, secretary of state, or board, as the case may be, based upon census tract data or other officially compiled data.

"President" means the president of the board.

"Publication" or "publish" means at least one publication in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the service authority. If there is no such newspaper, publication shall be by posting in at least three public places within the service authority.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1642, § 66, effective May 31, 1994.)

"Secretary" means the secretary of the board.

"Service" means a function, service, or facility which a service authority is authorized to provide in accordance with this article.

"Service authority" means a body corporate and political subdivision of the state formed pursuant to the provisions of section 17 of article XIV of the constitution of the state of Colorado for the purpose of providing certain functions, services, and facilities in the manner and within the limitations provided in this article.

"Special election" means any election called by the board for submission of public questions, the election to be held on a Tuesday other than a general election day.

"Special taxing district" means a geographical area within a service authority designated and delineated by the board to facilitate the furnishing of services and the collection of ad valorem taxes and charges for such services.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 453, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-3.

L. 80:

(5) amended, p. 415, § 26, effective February 21.

L. 85:

(12) amended, p. 1350, § 23, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(12) and (16) amended, p. 896, § 139, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(3.5) added and (12) amended, p. 1642, § 66, effective May 31.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1979, § 110, effective August 5.

32-7-104. Territorial requirements for service authorities.

No territory shall be included within the boundaries of more than one service authority.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a service authority shall include all of the territory of at least one county and may include such additional entire counties as may be proposed, if each county has some contiguity with another county within the service authority and does not result in the formation of an enclave.

In no event shall any service authority be formed in the metropolitan area of Denver which does not include that part of Adams county excluding census enumeration districts 1, 2, and 3 of the east Adams division, and that part of Arapahoe county excluding census enumeration districts 1, 2, and 3 of the east Arapahoe division, as such districts and divisions are used by the United States bureau of the census in designation of land areas for the purposes of the 1970 census, and all of the city and county of Denver, and all of Jefferson county, but an additional county or additional counties may be included.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, no county may be divided upon formation of a service authority or thereafter except in the case of a municipality having territory in two counties which are not within the same service authority, either proposed or formed, in which event the municipality may be included in either of two service authorities without regard to county boundary lines, as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3).

Neither the governing body nor the residents of any such municipality shall participate in any of the procedures by which the service authority is originally formed, but, after a service authority is formed which includes the territory of either county, such municipality may be included in the service authority to which it directs its request for inclusion in the manner provided in section 32-7-131.

The boundaries of any service authority shall not be such as to create any enclave.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 454, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-4.

L. 75:

(2) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1296, § 1, effective June 16.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 573, § 1, effective April 7.

32-7-105. Petition or resolution for formation - designation of services.

The formation of a service authority shall be initiated by a petition signed by eligible electors of the proposed service authority in number not less than five percent of the votes cast in the proposed service authority for all candidates for the office of governor at the last preceding general election or by resolution adopted by a majority of the governing bodies of the counties and municipalities having territory within the boundaries of the proposed service authority. The petition or resolution shall be filed with the district court of the county within the proposed service authority which has the largest population and a copy thereof delivered to the organizational commission upon its appointment by the court.

(1.5) Local governing bodies in their resolution for formation or the people in their petition for formation may designate which services listed in section 32-7-111 are to be initially administered by the proposed service authority, subject to the approval of the registered electors as provided in section 17 of article XIV of the state constitution, and the manner in which such services are to be submitted to the electors and may provide that such services shall be voted on separately or in combination with one or more other services. If such provisions are not set forth in the resolution or petition, the organizational commission shall make such determinations.

The petition or resolution shall state the name proposed for the service authority and shall list the counties to be included within the service authority and any municipality to be excluded from the authority pursuant to section 32-7-104.

Upon filing of the petition or resolution, the court shall fix a time not less than twenty nor more than forty days after the petition or resolution is filed for a hearing thereon. At least seven days prior to the hearing date, the clerk of the court shall give notice by publication of the pendency of the petition or resolution and of the time and place of hearing thereon. At the hearing, the court shall determine whether the requisite number of eligible electors have signed the petition or whether a resolution has been adopted by the requisite number of counties and municipalities. No petition with the requisite signatures nor any resolution passed by the requisite number of counties and municipalities shall be declared void on account of minor defects, and the court may, at any time, permit the petition or resolution to be amended to conform to the facts by correcting the defects.

If it appears at the conclusion of the hearings that the petition or resolution conforms with the requirements of section 17 of article XIV of the state constitution and this article, the court, by order entered of record, shall appoint an organizational commission according to the procedures required under section 32-7-107.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 455, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-5.

L. 75:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1298, § 1, effective June 20.

L. 85:

(1), (1.5), and (2)(b) amended, p. 1350, § 24, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, p. 896, § 140, effective January 1, 1993.

Cross references:

For service authorities, see § 17 of art. XIV, Colo. Const.

32-7-106. Priority of petition or resolution.

When the district court receives a resolution adopted by a majority of the governing bodies of the counties and municipalities or receives a petition signed by the requisite number of eligible electors pursuant to section 32-7-105 for the initiation of formation of a service authority, no other proceedings shall be commenced or prosecuted in that or any other court for the creation of another service authority involving all or any one of the same counties until the question of formation of the authority pursuant to the resolution or petition has been finally determined, unless the later filing is allowed under subsection (2) of this section.

A resolution filed within ten days of the date of the filing of a petition under the circumstances set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall take precedence over the petition and shall proceed to final determination before the petition may be further considered.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 455, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-6.

L. 85:

(1) amended, p. 1350, § 25, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 897, § 141, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-107. Court appoints an organizational commission and election committee.

For a service authority which is to be established in an area having a total population of less than five hundred thousand, the court shall appoint nine organizational commission members selected from the membership of the governing bodies of the county or counties and municipalities having territory within the boundaries of the proposed service authority, subject to the following limitations:

If more than one county is included within the boundaries of the proposed service authority, no more than five members of the organizational commission shall be residents of any one county or any one municipality, and at least one member shall be appointed from every county.

If only one county is included within the boundaries of the proposed service authority, no more than five members of the organizational commission shall be residents of any one municipality.

Subject to the limitations in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), for a service authority which is to be established in an area having a total population of five hundred thousand or more, the court shall appoint fifteen organizational commission members selected from the membership of the governing bodies of the county or counties and municipalities having territory within the boundaries of the proposed service authority.

If more than one county is included within the boundaries of the proposed service authority and to the extent feasible, the membership on the organizational commission shall be allocated:

Among counties in proportion to the population of each county within the service authority, but each county shall have at least one member on the commission; and

Among county commissioners and members of the governing bodies of municipalities within each county in proportion to the population of the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the counties.

If only one county is included within the boundaries of the proposed service authority and to the extent feasible, the membership on the organizational commission shall be allocated among the county commissioners and members of the governing bodies of municipalities within the county in proportion to the population of the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county.

At the hearing specified in section 32-7-105 (2)(b), the court shall appoint the county clerk and recorder of each county within the service authority as members of an election committee to administer the election provided for in the formation of the service authority and shall within seven days of the designation notify the county clerk and recorders of their appointment.

A majority of the county clerk and recorders shall constitute a quorum. A chairperson shall be elected by the county clerk and recorders at their first meeting, who may call additional meetings as necessary to accomplish the purposes of the election committee.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 456, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-7.

L. 92:

(3) amended, p. 897, § 142, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 573, § 2, effective April 7.

32-7-108. Service authority organizational commission.

The service authority organizational commission appointed pursuant to section 32-7-107 shall meet within twenty days after its appointment on a date designated by the district court. The service authority organizational commission shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman from among its membership. Further meetings of the commission shall be held upon call of the chairman or a majority of the members of the commission. All meetings shall be open to the public. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum. The commission may adopt such other rules for its operations and proceedings as it deems necessary or desirable. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses pursuant to law.

The service authority organizational commission shall, if the determination is not made in the resolution or petition for formation, determine which services listed in section 32-7-111 are to be administered and shall determine the maximum ad valorem mill levy (other than for debt purposes), if any, necessary to support each designated service by the proposed service authority upon its formation, subject to the approval of the eligible electors as provided in section 17 of article XIV of the state constitution. The maximum mill levy limitation, if any, required by this paragraph (a) shall be included as a part of the term "services" as used in this section and section 32-7-109.

Repealed.

Within ninety days after its initial meeting, the commission shall present to the district court a report listing services to be considered by the voters in each county included in the service authority. A majority vote of the members of the service authority organizational commission shall determine the services that shall be presented to the voters for their approval or rejection, if such services are not designated by the resolution or petition for formation.

The commission report shall also divide the service authority into compact districts of approximately equal population in accordance with the provisions of section 32-7-110 for the purpose of electing candidates to the service authority board. The number of districts shall equal the number of board members to be elected from districts. Such districts shall be numbered consecutively starting with number one, and the terms of office shall be as specified in section 32-7-110.

The commission shall specify the date for a special election for formation of the service authority, but if the organizational commission's report is completed not more than one hundred eighty days and not less than seventy days before the next general election, the election shall be held jointly with the next general election.

The service authority organizational commission shall be dissolved as of the day on which the election is held pursuant to section 32-7-109.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 456, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-8.

L. 75:

(2)(a) and (3)(a) amended and (2)(b) repealed, p. 1299, §§ 2, 4, effective June 20.

L. 85:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1351, § 26, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(2)(a) and (3)(c) amended, p. 898, § 143, effective January 1, 1993.

32-7-109. Election for formation, selection of services, and initial board of directors.

Within seven days after receipt of the organizational commission's report, the district court shall direct the election committee, as provided in section 32-7-107 (3), to conduct an election on the date designated by the organizational commission for the purpose of deciding whether a service authority is to be formed, to provide an opportunity for the eligible electors to approve services of the service authority, and to elect the board of directors of the service authority.

The court shall direct the election committee to publish notice thereof within seven days of the directive according to the provisions of section 1-5-205, C.R.S., setting forth the list of proposed services and the requirements for nomination to the board. Independent candidates for a district office may be nominated by filing with the election committee, on forms supplied by the committee, a nomination petition signed by at least twenty-five eligible electors of the district in which the candidate resides. Nothing in this article shall be construed to restrict a political party from making nominations to the board of directors of the service authority by conventions of delegates or by primary election or by both.

The election committee shall publish a second notice of the election pursuant to section 1-5-205, C.R.S., which shall include the names of the candidates nominated for the first board of directors, and shall again list the services to be decided upon.

The election shall be held and conducted as provided in articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S. The question of the formation of the service authority must receive the approval of a majority of votes cast, but no service may be authorized unless approved by a majority of the eligible electors voting thereon in each county within the service authority.

The election commission shall survey the returns as provided in article 10 of title 1, C.R.S., and shall certify the results to the court as provided in section 1-10-203, C.R.S. If a majority of the registered electors voting thereon vote "for" formation, the court shall declare, by order entered of record, that the service authority is formed in the corporate name designated in the petition or resolution and shall designate those services, if any, which were authorized by a majority of the registered electors voting thereon in each county at said election. Upon the filing with the court of the oath of office of members elected to the board, the court, by order entered of record, shall declare the members of the board elected and qualified and shall order the election committee to issue certificates of election pursuant to section 1-11-105, C.R.S., and the formation shall be complete. At that time the election committee shall be dissolved. The board shall be charged with administering those approved services in accordance with this article.

The entry of an order forming a service authority shall finally and conclusively establish its regular formation against all persons except the state of Colorado, in an action in the nature of quo warranto, commenced by the attorney general within thirty-five days after entry of such order, and not otherwise. The formation of the service authority shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding, except as expressly authorized in this section.

All necessary expenses for the elections and other proceedings conducted pursuant to sections 32-7-107, 32-7-108, and this section, including the expenses and reimbursements for the organizational commission, shall be paid by the counties within or partly within the service authority in proportion to the population of the respective counties or portions thereof within the service authority, and the governing bodies thereof shall enact any necessary supplemental appropriation.

Within fifteen days after the entry of the order forming a service authority, the clerk of the court shall file a copy of the decree with the board of county commissioners and the assessor of each county within the service authority and with the division of local government.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 457, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-9.

L. 80:

(1)(b) amended, p. 415, § 27, effective February 21.

L. 85:

(1)(b), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1351, § 27, effective April 30.

L. 92:

(1) to (4) amended, p. 898, § 144, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(4) amended, p. 1642, § 67, effective May 31.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 1106, § 47, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1476, § 38, effective June 1.

L. 98:

(1)(b) amended, p. 827, § 45, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 882, § 149, effective July 1.

32-7-110. Board of directors.

The governing body of the service authority shall be a board of directors in which all legislative power of the service authority is vested. In those service authorities having a population in excess of five hundred thousand, the board shall consist of fifteen members, all of whom shall reside in and be elected by the eligible electors of the respective districts. In those service authorities having a population of at least fifty thousand but not more than five hundred thousand, the board shall consist of nine members, all of whom shall reside in and be elected by the eligible electors of the respective districts. In those service authorities having a population of less than fifty thousand, the board shall consist of five members, all of whom shall reside in and be elected by the eligible electors of the respective districts. At the formation election, the terms for representatives from odd-numbered districts shall continue until their successors are elected at the second general election thereafter and are qualified, and the terms for those elected from even-numbered districts shall continue until their successors are elected at the first general election thereafter and are qualified. Thereafter all terms shall be for four years. For the first five years after formation of any service authority, or until January 1, 1980, whichever occurs first, the members shall be eligible electors of the service authority and shall be elected from among the mayors, councilpersons, trustees, and county commissioners holding office at the time of their election in municipalities and counties within or partially within the authority. Thereafter, any eligible elector of the service authority shall be eligible to hold office. Notwithstanding any provision in the charter of any municipality or county to the contrary, mayors, councilpersons, trustees, and county commissioners may additionally hold elective office with the service authority and be compensated as provided in this section.

At least ninety days prior to the first general election after the formation of the service authority, the board may change the boundary of any board of director district within the service authority. Thereafter such boundaries may be changed no more frequently than every four years or after announcement of the results of a decennial census. The board shall redistrict only by resolution passed by a majority of the members elected to the board, and any such redistricting shall be such as to provide compact districts of approximately equal population. No redistricting shall extend or shorten the term of office of any member of the board.

The board has power, by appointment, to fill all vacancies on the board, and the person so appointed shall hold office until the next general election and until a successor is elected and qualified. Any person so appointed shall reside in the district in which the vacancy occurred. If the term of the member creating the vacancy extends beyond the next general election, the appointment shall be for the unexpired term.

The board shall elect a president, vice-president, secretary, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The president and vice-president must be members of the board. The board may appoint a chief administrator, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The board shall prescribe by resolution the duties of said officers pursuant to the powers granted in this article. In addition to other powers provided by resolution, the president shall preside over meetings of the board and shall vote as a member of the board. All special and regular meetings of the board shall be held at locations which are within the boundaries of the district or which are within the boundaries of any county in which the district is located, in whole or in part, or in any county so long as the meeting location does not exceed twenty miles from the district boundaries. The provisions of this subsection (4) governing the location of meetings may be waived only if the following criteria are met:

The proposed change of location of a meeting of the board appears on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the board; and

A resolution is adopted by the board stating the reason for which a meeting of the board is to be held in a location other than under the provisions of this subsection (4) and further stating the date, time, and place of such meeting.

The board may provide by resolution for the compensation of its members in the amount of fifty dollars for each day a member is necessarily engaged in the business of the authority, in addition to the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by each member while so engaged. Except for the initial board, the compensation of a member shall not be increased nor diminished during his term of office.

Except as specifically provided otherwise, a majority of board members shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the members of the board shall be necessary for any action taken by the board except that a majority of a quorum may adjourn from day to day.

In addition to any acts of the board specifically required to be accomplished by resolution, any action adopting or revising a budget, appropriating funds, establishing the administrative organization and structure, or promulgating regulations enforceable by fine or penalty shall be passed by resolution. Resolutions promulgating regulations enforceable by fine or penalty shall be published one time prior to final passage and within fourteen days after passage; publication after final passage may be by reference. At least six days shall elapse between introduction and final passage of a resolution. Such resolution shall not take effect and be enforced until the expiration of thirty days after final passage except resolutions calling for special elections or those necessary to the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, which shall contain the reasons making the same necessary in a separate section. The excepted resolutions shall take effect in five days, if passed by an affirmative vote of three-fourths of the members of the board. All other actions of the board may be accomplished by motion.

Any board member may be recalled from office pursuant to the provisions and subject to the conditions of part 1 of article 12 of title 1, C.R.S.

Any resolution may be referred to or initiated by the eligible electors in accordance with the provisions and subject to the conditions of sections 31-11-104 and 31-11-105, C.R.S.

It is the duty of the board to comply with the provisions of parts 1, 5, and 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S. It is the further duty of the board to publish the results of its annual audit statement or report which shall be certified by the person making the audit, or by the governing body, if unaudited, in one issue of a newspaper of general circulation in the service authority. Such publication shall be no later than thirty days following completion of the audit statement or report.

The fiscal and budget year for all service authorities organized or operating under the provisions of this article shall be from January 1 through December 31 of each year.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 459, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-10.

L. 81:

(8) amended, p. 1624, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1) and (9) amended, p. 1352, § 28, effective April 30.

L. 90:

(4) amended, p. 1498, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1), (3), (8), and (9) amended, p. 899, § 145, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(9) amended, p. 699, § 8, effective May 4.

L. 95:

(9) amended, p. 442, § 29, effective May 8.

Cross references:

For the budget law, see part 1 of article 1 of title 29; for the local government uniform accounting law, see part 5 of article 1 of title 29; for the local government audit law, see part 6 of article 1 of title 29.

32-7-111. Designation of services.

Subject to local authorization as provided in section 32-7-112, local governing bodies, by resolution, or the people, by petition, or the service authority organizational commission, if such services are not designated by the resolution or petition for formation prior to formation, or the board after formation, may, by resolution, initiate one or more of the following services or combinations thereof:

Domestic water collection, treatment, and distribution;

Urban drainage and flood control;

Sewage collection, treatment, and disposal;

Public surface transportation;

Collection of solid waste, but the service authority shall not collect solid waste except on a finding by the board that existing solid waste collection service is inadequate. Such finding shall be in addition to the concurrent majority requirement of section 32-7-112 (1)(a).

Disposal of solid waste;

Parks and recreation;

Libraries;

Fire protection;

Hospitals, including convalescent nursing homes, ambulance services, and any other health and medical care facilities or services;

Museums, zoos, art galleries, theaters, and other cultural facilities or services;

Housing;

Weed and pest control;

Central purchasing, computer services, equipment pool, and any other management services for local governments, including procurement of supplies; acquisition, management, maintenance, and disposal of property and equipment; legal services; special communication systems; or any other similar services to local governments which are directly related to improving the efficiency or operation of local governments;

Local gas or electric services or heating and cooling services from geothermal resources, solar or wind energy, hydroelectric or renewable biomass resources, including waste and cogenerated heat; except that no facilities of a municipally owned utility shall be combined with the facilities of another municipally owned utility without its consent and except that neither the initiation nor rendering of local gas and electric services under this paragraph (o) shall interfere with, impair, or otherwise affect any franchise, certificate of public convenience and necessity, or the services being rendered by any other supplier operating subject to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado;

Jails and rehabilitation; and

Land and soil preservation.

Unless authorized pursuant to section 32-7-112 (2), the services provided by a service authority shall be provided on a concurrent basis with local jurisdictions. This shall not prohibit a board from contracting with local governments or state government for the provision, construction, or operation of any service by the service authority or state or local government, nor does it prohibit any local government from voluntarily vesting exclusive jurisdiction for the provision of a given service with the service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 461, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-11.

L. 73:

p. 997, § 1.

L. 75:

IP(1) amended, p. 1299, § 3, effective June 20.

L. 81:

(1)(o) amended, p. 1457, § 6, effective May 27.

32-7-112. Local authorization of functions, services, and facilities.

No service designated in section 32-7-111 shall be provided by a service authority unless such service, together with the maximum ad valorem tax mill levy (other than for debt purposes), if any, necessary to support each such service, has been submitted to and authorized by a majority of the eligible electors voting thereon in each county within the service authority.

Any service submitted to the eligible electors for their approval or rejection may be designated in general terms without limitation on concurrent or contractual arrangements among the various local governments; but, if the service is to be provided on an exclusive basis, as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the proposition submitted to the eligible electors shall state that such service is to be provided on an exclusive basis. Any mill levy limitation submitted for authorization by the eligible electors shall be designated in specific terms, whether the services to be supported thereby are on a concurrent or exclusive basis.

Any proposition initiated after formation of a service authority shall be submitted by resolution of the board, by resolution of a majority of the governing boards of counties and municipalities, or by a petition signed by eligible electors of the service authority in number not less than five percent of the votes cast in the service authority for all candidates for the office of governor at the last preceding general election.

At any general election following formation of a service authority, the board may submit a proposal to the eligible electors providing that any one or more services designated in section 32-7-111, including the types of services assumed pursuant to section 32-7-143, shall be provided exclusively by the service authority. The proposal may also be submitted at that time by resolution of a majority of the governing bodies of counties and municipalities or by petition signed by the eligible electors of the service authority in number not less than five percent of the votes cast in the service authority for all candidates for the office of governor at the last preceding general election.

If a majority of the eligible electors voting at any general election approve the designation of one or more services as exclusive, the board shall be responsible and shall have final authority for the provision of the service within its boundaries. Counties, municipalities, and special districts organized pursuant to part 2 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., or article 1 or part 4 of article 4 of this title shall be prohibited from providing the services within the boundaries of the service authority. The designation shall not preclude a service authority from contracting with local governments or the state government for any service; nor shall the designation relieve local governments from the responsibility of providing the service for a period of two years or until the time that the board can provide for the orderly transfer of assets, liabilities, and obligations of the local governments to the service authority.

Source:

L. 72:

p. 462, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-25-12.

L. 81:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1624, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section amended, p. 1352, § 29, effective April 30.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 900, § 146, effective January 1, 1993.